Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 8
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMS

27-50-801. Veteran suicide prevention pilot program - rules - report - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Pilot program" means the veteran suicide prevention pilot program described in subsection (2) of this section.

"Veteran" has the same meaning set forth in section 28-5-100.3.

The behavioral health administration shall establish a veteran suicide prevention pilot program to reduce the suicide rate and suicidal ideation among veterans by providing no-cost, stigma-free, confidential, and effective behavioral health treatment for veterans and their families.

The BHA shall establish the pilot program to provide services for seven hundred veterans in El Paso county. Subject to available appropriations, the BHA may, at any time, expand the pilot program to serve more than seven hundred veterans or to other areas of the state.

The pilot program must:

Provide a single phone number or offer electronic means of contacting the pilot program, including e-mail or an electronic form on the pilot program's website, that a veteran may use to contact the pilot program to make inquiries about available services and schedule consultations and treatment appointments;

Provide treatment for conditions experienced by veterans that may contribute to suicidal ideation, including, but not limited to, post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, military sexual trauma, substance use disorder, and symptoms of traumatic brain injury; and

Develop an individualized treatment plan for each veteran who is receiving treatment.

The pilot program may enter into agreements with treatment providers in the pilot program area to provide the services described in subsections (3)(a)(II) and (3)(a)(III) of this section.

The BHA shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.

The BHA may enter into an agreement with a nonprofit or educational organization to administer the pilot program. The nonprofit or educational organization must have at least five years' experience providing services described in this section to veterans and satisfy any additional qualifications established by the BHA. The BHA shall adopt rules to establish additional qualifications for a nonprofit or educational organization to ensure efficient and effective administration of the pilot program and a process for selecting a nonprofit or educational organization to administer the pilot program.

In its annual report to the committees of reference pursuant to section 2-7-203, the BHA shall include information concerning the pilot program and whether any changes should be made to the pilot program that would increase its effectiveness. In its final report prior to the repeal of this section, the BHA shall include a recommendation of whether the pilot program should be continued.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1483, § 1, effective July 1.

27-50-802. Study of health effects of felonizing fentanyl possession - repeal.

No later than November 1, 2022, the BHA shall contract with an independent nonprofit or educational entity that has expertise in clinical epidemiology, biostatistics, substance use and addiction, data collection and analysis, and, if possible, the intersection between the criminal justice system and substance use, to conduct an independent study of the health effects of criminal penalties pursuant to changes to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5) in House Bill 22-1326, enacted in 2022. At a minimum, the study must address the following:

Whether the penalties pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5):

Decreased or increased fentanyl-related overdoses, both fatal and nonfatal, among individuals charged with a felony compared to individuals charged with a misdemeanor pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5), and compared to individuals with opiate misuse or use disorder not charged with criminal possession of opiates; and

Increased or decreased initiation and retention of evidence-based, effective treatment for individuals charged with an opiate use disorder among individuals charged with a felony compared to individuals charged with a misdemeanor pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5), and compared to individuals with opiate misuse or use disorder who were not charged with criminal possession of opiates;

Differential health outcomes for individuals based on the individual's race, gender, ethnicity, age, economic status, pregnancy or postpartum status, or housing status, for individuals charged with a felony pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5), compared to individuals charged with a misdemeanor pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5), and compared to individuals with opiate misuse or use disorders who were not charged pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5). Differential health outcomes to consider include, but are not limited to, fatal and nonfatal overdoses and initiation and retention on medications for opiate use disorder.

Whether effective, evidence-based treatment for opiate use disorder in the general population diminished in quality or quantity as a result of individuals ordered by the court into treatment based on charges brought pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5); and

Whether penalties pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5) impact the likelihood of individuals addicted to fentanyl to seek or receive treatment, provide help to another person in the case of an overdose, or utilize naloxone, non-laboratory synthetic opiate detection tests, and other harm reduction resources.

The BHA shall make reasonable efforts to provide necessary data requested by the independent entity to complete the study required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The BHA shall establish a data-sharing agreement with, at a minimum, the department of public health and environment, the department of health care policy and financing, the judicial department, the department of corrections, the department of regulatory agencies, and, if feasible, county sheriffs and county coroners, to provide data to the independent entity including, but not limited to:

All reasonably available criminal justice data requested by the independent entity;

Opiate overdose death records, including toxicology reports, if available;

Prescription data for medication for opiate use disorder, including for individuals in jail or prison charged pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5);

Encounters with emergency medical services providers, law enforcement agencies, or health-care facilities for fatal and nonfatal fentanyl or other opiate-related overdose; and

Available information regarding the history of overdose, incarceration, and substance use treatment for individuals charged pursuant to section 18-18-403.5 (2.5), including whether the individual has sought and been denied on-demand treatment.

The independent entity may perform a qualitative assessment by, at a minimum, conducting focus groups or interviews with a representative sample of individuals who use drugs and substance use disorder care providers and harm reduction providers across the state and continuum.

No later than December 31, 2024, the independent entity shall submit a comprehensive report of the entity's findings to the BHA.

No later than January 31, 2025, the BHA shall publish the report on the BHA's website and submit the report to the house of representatives judiciary committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, the senate health and human services committee, and the senate judiciary committee, or their successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required pursuant to section 2-7-203.

The costs associated with performing the study pursuant to this section must be paid from the correctional treatment cash fund created in section 18-19-103 (4).

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1665, § 43, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 57 of chapter 225 (HB 22-1326), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act adding this section takes effect only if HB 22-1278 (chapter 222) becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1326 or HB 22-1278, whichever is later. HB 22-1278 became law, and both bills have an effective date of July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.

27-50-803. Technical assistance to jails - appropriation - repeal.

The behavioral health administration shall provide technical assistance to facilities in meeting their requirements pursuant to section 17-26-104.9 (1.5). Technical assistance includes development and implementation of medication-assisted treatment, development of guidelines for nonmedical evaluations, including timelines for performing a subsequent medical evaluation and administering medical withdrawal management, approval of prescribers by the United States drug enforcement agency, and other appropriate withdrawal management care, and assistance with identifying bulk purchasing opportunities for necessary services.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the behavioral health and mental health cash fund, created in section 24-75-230, to the behavioral health administration for the purpose of providing technical assistance to jails with meeting their requirements pursuant to section 17-26-104.9, including providing funding to jails to cover the services required pursuant to section 17-26-104.9.

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1669, § 47, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 57 of chapter 225 (HB 22-1326), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act adding this section takes effect only if HB 22-1278 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1326 or HB 22-1278, whichever is later. HB 22-1278 became law, and both bills have an effective date of July 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1326 stating the purpose of, and the provision directing legislative staff agencies to conduct, a post-enactment review pursuant to § 2-2-1201 scheduled in 2025, see sections 1 and 55 of chapter 225, Session Laws of Colorado 2022. To obtain a copy of the review, once completed, go to "Legislative Resources and Requirements" on the Colorado General Assembly's website.